Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB110.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
charter county government, unified local government, consolidated local
government, or planning unit that is engaged in planning and zoning under
this chapter; and
(b) "Short-term rental" means the rental of a dwelling unit or part of a
dwelling unit, other living or sleeping space, an accessory dwelling unit, or
any other space made available for rent for terms of less than thirty (30)
consecutive days at a time.
(2) A local government shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation that:
(a) Requires a conditional use permit or other similar permit to be obtained to
use a property as a short-term rental; or
(b) Imposes density-based restrictions on short-term rentals, including any
requirement that short-term rentals:
1. Be spaced any distance apart from other short-term rentals; or
2. May not exceed a specified percentage or number of housing units in
a given building, zoning district, or other geographical boundary.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a local government from adopting
or enforcing ordinances or regulations that are applicable to all dwellings and
are necessary for public health or safety, provided that those ordinances or
regulations do not treat short-term rentals differently from other residential uses
of property.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/6/2025 8:48 AM Jacketed